de: Skalpellgriff-Nummer: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Sonstiges
tr: Neşter sapı numarası: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Diğer
es: Número de mango de bisturí: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Otros
ja: メスハンドルの番号: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; その他
sv: Skalpellhandtagsnummer: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Övrigt
en: Scalpel handle number: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Other
bg-BG: Номер на дръжката на скалпела: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Други
da: Skalpelhåndtagsnummer: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Andet
nb: Skalpellhåndtaknummer: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Annet
hr-HR: Broj drške skalpela: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Ostalo
ko: 메스대 번호: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; 기타
el: Αριθμός λαβής νυστεριού: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Άλλο
ro-RO: Numărul mânerului bisturiului: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Altele
cs: Číslo rukojeti skalpelu: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Jiné
sl-SI: Številka ročaja skalpela: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Drugo
fr: Numéro du manche du scalpel: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Autre
sk-SK: Číslo rukoväte skalpelu: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Iné
th: หมายเลขด้ามมีดผ่าตัด: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; อื่นๆ
vi: Số cán dao mổ: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Khác
fi: Leikkausveitsen kahvan numero: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Muu
pl: Numer rękojeści skalpela: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Inne
lt-LT: Skalpelio rankenos numeris: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Kita
hu: Szikenyél száma: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Egyéb
it: Numero del manico del bisturi: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Altro
nl: Aantal scalpelgrepen: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Andere
pt-BR: Número do cabo do bisturi: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Outro
zh-CN: 手术刀手柄编号: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; 其他
pt-PT: Número do cabo do bisturi: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Outro
zh-TW: 手術刀手柄數量: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; 其他
ru: Номер ручки скальпеля: 3; 3L; 4; 4L; 7; 9; Другой